Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.535.040

Manner and result of election.

Elections hereunder shall be by ballot, and conducted in the manner provided for conducting annual school elections. The ballot must contain the words, "Validating and ratifying indebtedness, yes," or the words, "Validating and ratifying indebtedness, no." Ballots containing the words, "Validating and ratifying indebtedness, yes," shall be counted in favor of validating and ratifying such indebtedness, and ballots containing the words, "Validating and ratifying indebtedness, no," shall be counted against validating and ratifying such indebtedness. At their next meeting following ascertainment of the result of the election from the county auditor, the board of directors of any such district holding such an election shall cause to be entered a minute thereof on the records of such district. The qualifications of voters at such election shall be the same as prescribed for the election of school officials.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.52.040. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 332 s 4; RRS s 4959; prior: 1897 c 118 s 130; 1895 c 21 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.52.040, 28.52.040.]

NOTES:

Conduct of elections, canvass: RCW 29A.60.010.